Washington statutes.
RCW 15.62.040

Powers and duties of commission.

The commission shall have the following powers and duties:

(1) To elect a chairperson and other officers as it deems advisable;

(2) To promulgate rules and regulations under the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, and RCW 15.04.200 as necessary to effectuate the purpose and policies of this chapter;

(3) To administer and enforce the provisions of this chapter and perform all acts and exercise all powers reasonably necessary to fulfill the purpose thereof;

(4) To employ and discharge advertising agents, attorneys as permitted by the attorney general, agents, and employees as it deems necessary, and to prescribe their duties and powers and fix their compensation;

(5) To establish offices, hire employees who shall be exempt from chapter 41.06 RCW, incur expenses which shall not exceed revenues, enter into contracts, and create such liabilities as are reasonable and proper for the administration of this chapter;

(6) To investigate and refer violations of this chapter to local prosecuting attorneys or special prosecutors appointed by the commission and the local prosecuting attorney;

(7) To contract for scientific research designed to improve production, pollination, management, quality, processing, and distribution and to develop and discover uses for products of the honey bee industry;

(8) To make in its name advertising contracts and other agreements necessary to promote the industry and bee products and services in state, national, and foreign markets;

(9) To keep accurate records of all commission dealings, which shall be open to public inspection and audit by authorized state agencies;

(10) To contract for research to develop more efficient methods of promoting the honey bee industry and its products and services;

(11) To develop and conduct educational programs for the benefit of industry and to inform the public regarding Washington's honey bee industry;

(12) To enter into contracts and agreements for purposes consistent with this chapter;

(13) To publish at least an annual report of its activities and financial status subject to audit by the state auditor;

(14) To establish an operating monetary reserve and carry over to subsequent fiscal periods any excess funds in the reserve: PROVIDED, That the reserve funds shall not exceed one fiscal period's budget. The reserve funds shall only be used to defray any expenses authorized under this chapter;

(15) To audit any affected person's records as described in RCW 15.62.200; and

(16) To consider the assessment of honey or manufactured bee supplies produced or sold in Washington. Assessments shall only be levied after a referendum is conducted and approved by a majority vote, as set forth in RCW 15.62.140(4), of persons engaged in the honey bee industry of Washington.

[ 1989 c 5 s 13.]